District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-2905

Posting of price scale.

Repealed.

History

Leg. Assem., June 20, 1872, § 1
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 29, 2004, D.C. Law 15-154, § 11(b), 50 DCR 10996

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2905.
1973 Ed., § 47-2905.